hu: Kompresszoráramkör-típus: DSP; Digitális; Dióda híd; FET; Hibrid; Többsávos; OTA; Optikai; PWM; Cső; VCA; Szelep; Variable-Mu; Egyéb
nl: Compressie circuittype: DSP; Digitaal; Diodebrug; FET; Hybride; Multiband; OTA; Optisch; PWM; Tube; VCA; Klep; Variabele-Mu; Andere
es: Tipo de circuito de compresión: DSP; Digital; Puente de diodos; FET; Híbrido; Multibanda; OTA; Óptico; PWM; Tubo; VCA; Válvula; Variable-Mu; Otros
vi: Loại mạch nén: DSP; Kỹ thuật số; Cầu diode; FET; Kết hợp; Đa dải; OTA; Quang học; PWM; Ống; VCA; Van; Variable-Mu; Khác
el: Τύπος κυκλώματος συμπίεσης: DSP; Ψηφιακό; Γέφυρα διόδων; FET; Υβριδικό; Πολυζωνικό; OTA; Οπτικό καλώδιο; PWM; Μακαρόνι; VCA; Βαλβίδα; Μεταβλητό-Mu; Άλλο
th: ประเภทวงจรคอมเพรสเซอร์: DSP; ดิจิทัล; ไดโอดบริดจ์; FET; ไฮบริด; มัลติแบนด์; OTA; ออปติคัล; PWM; หลอด; VCA; วาล์ว; Variable-Mu; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tip circuit de compresie: DSP; Digital; Punte cu diode; FET; Hibrid; Multi-bandă; OTA; Optic; PWM; Tub; VCA; Cu lampă; Variable-Mu; Altele
hr-HR: Vrsta kruga kompresije: DSP; Digitalna; Diodni most; FET; Hibridni; Višepojasni; OTA; Optički; PWM; Cijev; VCA; Ventilski; Variable-Mu; Ostalo
sl-SI: Tip kompresijskega vezja: DSP; Digitalna; Diodni most; FET; Hibridni; Večpasovni; OTA; Optično; PWM; Tuba; VCA; Ventilski; Spremenljivi Mu; Drugo
ko: 압축 회로 유형: DSP; 디지털; 다이오드 브리지; FET; 하이브리드; 멀티밴드; OTA; 광학; PWM; 튜브; VCA; 밸브; Variable-Mu; 기타
sv: Kompressionskretstyp: DSP; Digitalt; Diodbrygga; FET; Hybrid; Multibands; OTA; Optisk; PWM; Tub; VCA; Ventil; Variable-Mu; Övrigt
bg-BG: Тип верига за компресия: DSP; Цифрова; Диоден мост; FET; Хибрид; Многолентов; OTA; Оптично; PWM; Тръба; VCA; Клапанен; Variable-Mu; Други
sk-SK: Typ kompresného obvodu: DSP; Digitálny; Diódový mostík; FET; Hybridný; Viacpásmový; OTA; Optický; PWM; Tuba; VCA; Ventilový; Variable-Mu; Iné
tr: Sıkıştırma devresi tipi: DSP; Dijital; Diyot köprüsü; FET; Hibrit; Çok bantlı; OTA; Optik; PWM; Tüp; VCA; Valf; Değişken-Mu; Diğer
da: Kompressionskredsløbstype: DSP; Digital; Diodebro; FET; Hybrid; Multibånd; OTA; Optisk; PWM; Tube; VCA; Ventil; Variable-Mu; Andet
lt-LT: Kompresijos grandinės tipas: DSP; Skaitmeninis; Diodų tiltas; FET; Hibridinė; Daugiajuostis; OTA; Optinis; PWM; Vamzdis; VCA; Vožtuvinis; Kintamasis mu; Kita
pl: Typ układu kompresji: DSP; Cyfrowy; Mostek diodowy; FET; Hybrydowy; Wielopasmowy; OTA; Optyczne; PWM; Świetlówka; VCA; Zaworowy; Variable-Mu; Inne
fi: Kompressoripiirin tyyppi: DSP; Digitaalinen; Diodisilta; FET; Hybridi; Monikaista; OTA; Optinen; PWM; Putkilo; VCA; Venttiili; Muuttuva-Mu; Muu
zh-TW: 壓縮電路類型: DSP; 數位; 二極體橋式; FET; 混合; 多頻段; OTA; 光學; PWM; 管狀; VCA; 真空管; 可變 Mu; 其他
ja: コンプレッション回路タイプ: DSP; デジタル; ダイオードブリッジ; FET; ハイブリッド; マルチバンド; OTA; 光学式; PWM; チューブ; VCA; バルブ; バリアブル MU; その他
de: Typ des Kompressionskreislaufs: DSP; Digital; Diodenbrücke; FET; Hybrid; Multiband; OTA; Optisch; PWM; Rohr; VCA; Ventil; Variable-Mu; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Tipo de circuito de compressão: DSP; Digital; Ponte de díodos; FET; Híbrido; Multi-banda; OTA; Ótico; PWM; Tubo; VCA; Válvula; Variable-Mu; Outro
ru: Тип схемы компрессии: DSP; Цифровые; Диодный мост; FET; Гибридные; Многополосный; OTA; Оптический; PWM; Трубчатый; VCA; Клапан; Variable-Mu; Другой
it: Tipo di circuito di compressione: DSP; Digitale; Ponte a diodi; FET; Ibrido; Multibanda; OTA; Ottico; PWM; Tubo; VCA; Valvola; Variable-Mu; Altro
zh-CN: 压缩电路类型: DSP; 数字版; 二极管桥; FET; 混合; 多频段; OTA; 光学; PWM; 管状滑道; VCA; 阀门; 可变增益; 其他
nb: Kompresjonskrets type: DSP; Digital; Diodebro; FET; Hybrid; Multibånd; OTA; Optisk; PWM; Slange; VCA; Ventil; Variable-Mu; Annet
cs: Typ kompresního obvodu: DSP; Digitální; Diodový můstek; FET; Hybridní; Vícepásmový; OTA; Optická; PWM; Tuba; VCA; Elektronkový; Variable-Mu; Jiné
en: Compression circuit type: DSP; Digital; Diode bridge; FET; Hybrid; Multi-band; OTA; Optical; PWM; Tube; VCA; Valve; Variable-Mu; Other
fr: Type de circuit de compression: DSP; Numérique; Pont de diodes; FET; Hybride; Multi-bande; OTA; Optique; PWM; Tube; VCA; Valve; Variable-Mu; Autre
pt-BR: Tipo de circuito de compressão: DSP; Digital; Ponte de diodos; FET; Híbrido; Multibanda; OTA; Óptica; PWM; Tubo; VCA; Válvula; Variable-Mu; Outro